Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1308
Hours of operation.

A city, county, village,
or other political subdivision of the state may limit the hours between 10:00
p.m. and 7:00 a.m. that an outdoor shooting range may operate.

Laws 2009, LB503, § 8.